Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.050

Authority of state officers and agencies to enter into agreements—Approval.

The officers and agencies of this state and its subdivisions having authority to place children are hereby empowered to enter into agreements with appropriate officers or agencies of or in other party states pursuant to paragraph (b) of Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children. Any such agreement which contains a financial commitment or imposes a financial obligation on this state or subdivision or agency thereof shall not be binding unless it has the approval in writing of the director of financial management in the case of the state and of the treasurer in the case of a subdivision of the state.

[ 1979 c 151 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 5.]